Wisconsin, session 2025, SB645.
do enact as follows:SB645,11Section 1. 97.18 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB645,2,4297.18 (4) The serving of colored oleomargarine or margarine at a public 3eating place as a substitute for table butter is prohibited unless it is ordered by the 4customer.SB645,25Section 2. 97.18 (5) of the statutes is renumbered 97.18 (5) (a) and amended 6to read:SB645,2,11797.18 (5) (a) The serving of oleomargarine or margarine to students, patients 8or inmates of any state institutions as a substitute for table butter is prohibited, 9except that such substitution may be ordered by the institution superintendent 10when necessary for the health of a specific patient or inmate, if directed by the 11physician in charge of the patient or inmate.SB645,312Section 3. 97.18 (5) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB645,2,141397.18 (5) (b) 1. In this paragraph, “school” has the meaning given in s. 118.294 14(1) (f).SB645,2,17152. The serving to students at a school of oleomargarine or margarine as a 16substitute for butter is prohibited unless it is ordered by the student or for the 17student by the student’s parent or guardian.SB645,2,21183. The use of oleomargarine or margarine as a substitute for butter in meals 19prepared for service to students at a school is prohibited, except when necessary for 20the health of a specific student as directed by the student’s health care provider, as 21defined in s. 150.84 (3).SB645,422Section 4. Effective date.SB645,3,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 2publication.SB645,3,33